Colorado, session 2026A, SB111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-1004, amend
(2)(a) as follows:
18-1.3-1004. Indeterminate sentence.
(2) (a) The district court having jurisdiction, based on
consideration of the evaluation conducted pursuant to section 16-11.7-104
C.R.S., and the factors specified in section 18-1.3-203, may sentence a
sex offender to probation for an indeterminate period of at least ten years
for a class 4 felony or twenty years for a class 2 or 3 felony and a
maximum of the sex offender's natural life; except that, if the sex
offender committed a sex offense that constitutes a crime of violence, as
defined in section 18-1.3-406, or committed a sex offense that makes him
or her THE SEX OFFENDER eligible for sentencing as a habitual sex
offender against children pursuant to section 18-3-412, or COMMITTED a
sex offense requiring sentencing pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
(1) SUBSECTION (1)(e) of this section, OR COMMITTED SEXUAL ASSAULT
ON A CHILD THAT IS A CLASS 4 FELONY PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-405,
OR COMMITTED SEXUAL ASSAULT ON A CHILD BY ONE IN A POSITION OF
TRUST THAT IS A CLASS 4 FELONY PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-405.3, OR
COMMITTED A SEXUAL ASSAULT ON A CHILD BY ONE IN A POSITION OF
-2- SB26-111

TRUST THAT IS A CLASS 3 FELONY PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-405.3
(2)(a), the court shall sentence the sex offender to the department of
corrections as provided in subsection (1) of this section. For any sex
offender sentenced to probation pursuant to this subsection (2), the court
shall order that the sex offender, as a condition of probation, participate
in an intensive supervision probation program established pursuant to
section 18-1.3-1007, until further order of the court.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-405, add (3.5)
as follows:
18-3-405. Sexual assault on a child.
(3.5) PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-1004 (2)(a), THE COURT SHALL
SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF A CLASS 4 FELONY OF SEXUAL
ASSAULT ON A CHILD TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS FOR AN
INDETERMINATE TERM OF INCARCERATION OF AS SET FORTH IN SECTION
18-1.3-1004 (1)(a).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-405.3, add (4.5)
as follows:
18-3-405.3. Sexual assault on a child by one in a position of
trust.
(4.5) (a) PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-1004 (2)(a), THE COURT
SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF A CLASS 4 FELONY OF SEXUAL
ASSAULT ON A CHILD BY ONE IN A POSITION OF TRUST TO THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS FOR AN INDETERMINATE TERM OF INCARCERATION AS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 18-1.3-1004 (1)(a).
(b) PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-1004 (2)(a), THE COURT SHALL
SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF A CLASS 3 FELONY OF SEXUAL
ASSAULT ON A CHILD BY ONE IN A POSITION OF TRUST, AS DESCRIBED IN
-3- SB26-111

SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS FOR AN INDETERMINATE TERM OF INCARCERATION AS SET
FORTH IN SECTION 18-1.3-1004 (1)(a).
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to offenses committed on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-4- SB26-111